Vermont, session 2025-2026, H620.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. WEALTH TAX COMMISSION; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Wealth Tax Commission to study the
taxation of wealth and investment gains that currently escape income taxation.
(b) Membership. The Wealth Tax Commission shall be composed of the
following members:
(1) one current member of the House of Representatives, who shall be
appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(2) one current member of the Senate, who shall be appointed by the
President Pro Tempore;
VT LEG #385593 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.620
2026 Page 2 of 6
(3) the Commissioner of the Department of Financial Regulation or
designee; and
(4) the Commissioner of Taxes or designee.
(c) Assistance.
(1) The Wealth Tax Commission shall have the administrative and
technical assistance of the Joint Fiscal Office, which shall contract with a
facilitator who has knowledge of wealth taxes, mark-to-market income tax
reform, or other reforms for taxing wealth and investment gains that currently
escape income taxation.
(2) The facilitator contracted pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall coordinate with the following institutions for participation
with the Wealth Tax Commission:
(A) legislative members and staff from other states;
(B) administrators and staff from the revenue agencies of other states;
(C) national academic and legal experts on wealth and income
taxation; and
(D) the Multistate Tax Commission.
(d) Powers and duties.
(1) The Wealth Tax Commission shall study the policy considerations
surrounding the taxation of wealth and investment gains that currently escape
VT LEG #385593 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.620
2026 Page 3 of 6
taxation, implementation issues, and coordinating with other states to
uniformly tax forms of wealth and investment gains.
(2) The Wealth Tax Commission shall report on the following issues
relating to the implementation of a wealth tax:
(A) addressing taxpayers who move into and away from a state
during a tax year and identifying the best approach for residency criteria for
subjecting individuals to a tax on wealth and investments gains that currently
escape income taxation;
(B) valuing nonpublic assets, including a functional mechanism for
taxpayers to contest a state’s value and alternative mechanisms for valuing
difficult-to-value assets;
(C) addressing losses in taxpayers’ net worth, including whether
losses should be carried over in future tax years;
(D) addressing situations where wealth is primarily held in real
estate, such as farmers and other taxpayers who may lack the funds needed to
pay the tax without selling real estate;
(E) determining whether legislative changes are needed to require
nonpublic information be made public for purposes of asset valuation, such as
adding transparency to private business valuations; and
(F) determining the best practices of other states by conducting a
survey of other states’ experiences with key components of taxing wealth and
VT LEG #385593 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.620
2026 Page 4 of 6
investment gains that currently escape taxation, including valuing businesses,
using financial accounting information, and withholding the income of
nonresident individuals.
(3) The Wealth Tax Commission shall report on the following issues
relating to coordinating with other states to enact a wealth tax:
(A) identifying and addressing legal considerations across states,
such as federal preemption, the ability to form an interstate compact for state
taxation, constitutional differences between states that could affect the
coordination of enacting uniform tax laws, and the plausibility of developing a
uniform approach or provisions for taxation of wealth and investment gains
that currently escape income taxation;
(B) identifying the best approach for multiple states to enact a wealth
tax contingent on passage or enactment in other states;
(C) identifying the components of a wealth tax that are most
desirable to be uniform across and the components that can be left to the
discretion of individual states;
(D) addressing how to best coordinate residency requirements, basis
adjustments, crediting taxes paid in other states on wealth and investment gains
that currently escape income taxation, enforcement, and information reporting
across states; and
VT LEG #385593 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.620
2026 Page 5 of 6
(E) determining whether interstate cooperation or a compact requires
wealth tax categories to be uniform across states, including an examination of
the differences between mark-to-market taxation and other forms of wealth
taxation.
(e) Report. On or before November 1, 2027, the Wealth Tax Commission
shall submit a written report to the House Committee on Ways and Means and
the Senate Committee on Finance with its findings and recommendations.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The facilitator shall call the first meeting of the Commission to occur
on or before September 15, 2026.
(2) The Commission shall elect a chair from among its legislative
members at the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Commission shall cease to exist on July 1, 2028.
(g) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Commission shall be entitled to per
diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23
for not more than 12 meetings. These payments shall be made from monies
appropriated to the General Assembly.
(h) Appropriation. To the extent funds are available, the sum of
$125,000.00 is appropriated to the Joint Fiscal Office from the General Fund in
VT LEG #385593 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.620
2026 Page 6 of 6
fiscal year 2027 to contract with a facilitator pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) of
this section and for other resources relating to the work of the Commission.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385593 v.1